Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 9 Children
11-9-13.1.
Cigarette and tobacco vending machines.

No cigarettes, nor any other tobacco product, nor electronic nicotine-delivery system product shall be sold from any device or vending machine that is in an area not continuously supervised and in direct line of sight of an authorized person employed by the person, firm, or corporation that owns the business occupying the premises in which the device or vending machine is located, nor shall any tobacco product, nor electronic nicotine-delivery system product be sold from any device or vending machine that is in an area supervised by such an authorized person unless the device or vending machine is equipped with an electronic locking device that will not allow the device or vending machine to dispense a pack of cigarettes, or any other tobacco product, or electronic nicotine-delivery system product unless it is electronically unlocked from a secured position inaccessible to the public and under the supervision of an authorized person employed by the person, firm, or corporation that owns the business occupying the premises in which the device or vending machine is located. “Direct line of sight” means that the vending machine and the purchaser of cigarettes or electronic nicotine-delivery system product must be visible to the authorized person pressing the unlock button while the unlock button is being activated. Provided, a locking device shall not be required in an establishment licensed to sell alcoholic beverages that limits access to persons over the age of twenty-one (21) years.

No cigarettes, nor any other tobacco product, nor electronic nicotine-delivery system product shall be sold from any device or vending machine from which non-tobacco products are sold.

No cigarettes shall be sold in packs that contain less than twenty (20) cigarettes.

Any person, firm, or corporation who or that owns a business occupying the premises in which a device or vending machine that dispenses cigarettes, or any other tobacco product or electronic nicotine-delivery system product is located who or that shall violate any of the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall for the first offense be subject to a fine of seventy-five dollars ($75.00), for the second offense, be subject to a fine of one hundred fifty dollars ($150), and for the third and any subsequent offense, be subject to a fine of five hundred dollars ($500); provided, that in the event that there are no offenses in three (3) successive years from the date of the last offense, then the next offense shall be treated as the first offense.

Any person, firm, or corporation who or that shall violate subsection (c) of this section shall, for the first offense, be subject to a fine of seventy-five dollars ($75.00), for the second offense, be subject to a fine of one hundred fifty dollars ($150), and for the third and any subsequent offense, be subject to a fine of five hundred dollars ($500); provided, that in the event that there are no offenses in three (3) successive years from the date of the last offense, then the next offense shall be treated as the first offense.

One-half (1/2) of all the fines collected pursuant to this section shall be transferred to the municipalities in which the citations originated. One-half (1/2) of all the fines collected pursuant to this section shall be transferred to the general fund.

Severability. If any provision of this section or the application of it to any person or circumstance is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this section, which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 223, § 1.

11-9-13.2.
Short title.

§§

11-9-13.2

—

11-9-13.19

shall be cited as “An Act to Stop the Illegal Sale of Tobacco Products to Individuals Under Twenty-One (21) Years of Age.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 204, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 205, § 1, effective July 7, 2021.

11-9-13.3.
Legislative intent — Purpose.

The use of tobacco by Rhode Island children is a health and substance abuse problem of the utmost severity. The legislature finds that tobacco product usage by children in Rhode Island is rampant and increasing with over thirty percent (30%) of high school students smoking. The present law prohibiting the sale of tobacco to children is being ignored by many retailers. Rhode Island tobacco retailers illegally sell four million eight hundred thousand (4,800,000) packs, over eleven million dollars ($11,000,000) in tobacco product sales, to children annually. Tobacco industry advertising targets children as the replacement smokers for the one thousand one hundred forty-five (1,145) adults who die daily from tobacco product usage. Approximately seventy percent (70%) of the Rhode Island high school seniors who are smoking today will be the addicted adult smokers of tomorrow. According to the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), smoking-related direct medical costs in Rhode Island in 1990 climbed to one hundred eighty-six million dollars ($186,000,000). This is an ongoing, escalating financial burden borne by every business, large and small, and every person, smoker and nonsmoker, in Rhode Island. This is a health and economic drain created by each new generation of children who begin using tobacco products and become addicted to nicotine. It is the intent of this legislation to preserve and protect the health of children by: (1) stopping the illegal sale of tobacco to children, and (2) by severely punishing those who disregard the laws relating to the illegal sale of tobacco products to children.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 321, § 1.

11-9-13.4.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Bidi cigarette” means any product that (i) Contains tobacco that is wrapped in temburni or tender leaf, or that is wrapped in any other material identified by rules of the department of health that is similar in appearance or characteristics to the temburni or tender leaf, and (ii) Does not contain a smoke filtering device.

“Court” means any appropriate district court of the state of Rhode Island.

“Dealer” is synonymous with the term “retail tobacco products dealer.”

“Department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals” means the state of Rhode Island behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals department, its employees, agents, or assigns.

“Department of taxation” means the state of Rhode Island taxation division, its employees, agents, or assigns.

“Electronic nicotine-delivery system” means an electronic device that may be used to simulate smoking in the delivery of nicotine or other substance to a person inhaling from the device, and includes, but is not limited to, an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic little cigars, electronic pipe, or electronic hookah, “heat not burn products,” e-liquids, e-liquid products, or any related device and any cartridge or other component of such device.

“Electronic nicotine-delivery system product” means any combination of electronic nicotine-delivery system and/or e-liquid and/or any derivative thereof, and/or any e-liquid container. Electronic nicotine-delivery system products shall not include hemp-derived consumable cannabidiol (CBD) products as defined in §

2-26-3

.

“E-liquid” and “e-liquid products” means any liquid or substance placed in or sold for use in an electronic nicotine-delivery system that generally utilizes a heating element that aerosolizes, vaporizes, or combusts a liquid or other substance containing nicotine or nicotine derivative:

Whether the liquid or substance contains nicotine or a nicotine derivative; or

Whether sold separately or sold in combination with a personal vaporizer, electronic nicotine-delivery system, or an electronic inhaler.

“License” is synonymous with the term “retail tobacco products dealer license” or “electronic nicotine-delivery system license” or any license issued under chapter 20 of title 44 or chapter 1 of title 23.

“License holder” is synonymous with the term “retail tobacco products dealer” or “electronic nicotine-delivery system license” or any licenses issued under chapter 20 of title 44 or chapter 1 of title 23.

“Little cigars” means and includes any roll, made wholly or in part of tobacco, irrespective of size or shape, and irrespective of whether the tobacco is flavored, adulterated, or mixed with any other ingredient, where such roll has a wrapper or cover made of tobacco wrapped in leaf tobacco or any substance containing tobacco paper or any other material and where such roll has an integrated filter, except where such wrapper is wholly or in greater part made of tobacco and where such roll has an integrated filter and weighs over four (4) pounds per thousand (1,000).

“Person” means any individual person, firm, fiduciary, partnership, trust, association, or corporation licensed as a retail dealer to sell tobacco products within the state.

“Retail tobacco products dealer” means the holder of a license to sell tobacco products at retail and shall include holders of all other licenses issued under chapter 20 of title 44 or chapter 1 of title 23.

“Retail tobacco products dealer license” means a license to sell tobacco products at retail as issued by the department of taxation.

“Spitting tobacco” also means snuff, powdered tobacco, chewing tobacco, dipping tobacco, pouch tobacco, or smokeless tobacco.

“Tobacco product(s)” means any product(s) containing, made of, or derived from tobacco or nicotine that is intended for human consumption or is likely to be consumed, whether inhaled, absorbed, or ingested by any other means, including, but not limited to, a cigarette, a little cigar as defined in §

44-20.2-1

, and any and all products as defined in §

44-20-1

, electronic nicotine-delivery system products, or any added substance that may be aerosolized, vaporized, or otherwise delivered by such an electronic nicotine-delivery system device, whether or not that substance contains nicotine.

“Tobacco product(s)” does not include drugs, devices, or combination products intended to treat tobacco or nicotine dependence that are authorized by the United States Food and Drug Administration, as those terms are defined in the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act. Nor does it include such authorized drugs, devices, or combination products with such treatment purpose by individuals under age twenty-one (21) if prescribed by a licensed prescriber such as a physician, nurse practitioner, or physician assistant.

“Underage individual” or “underage individuals” means any individual under the age of twenty-one (21).

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 104, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 204, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 205, § 1, effective July 7, 2021.

11-9-13.5.
Responsibility for tobacco or health issues.

The Rhode Island department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall develop, monitor, and aggressively enforce health rules and regulations pertaining to stopping the illegal sale of tobacco products which include electronic nicotine-delivery system products to individuals under twenty-one (21) years of age.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 204, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 205, § 1, effective July 7, 2021.

11-9-13.6.
Duties of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall:

Coordinate and promote the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter and serve as the primary liaison from this department to other state or local agencies, departments, or divisions on issues pertaining to stopping individuals’ under twenty-one (21) years of age access to tobacco products, which include electronic nicotine-delivery system products.

Provide retail tobacco products dealers and electronic nicotine-delivery system products dealers signs concerning the prohibition of sales to individuals under twenty-one (21) years of age. The signs, conforming to the requirements of this chapter, shall be sold at cost. This sign, or an exact duplicate of it made privately, shall be displayed in all locations where tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products, are sold.

Investigate concurrently with other state and local officials violations of this chapter.

Utilize unannounced statewide compliance checks of tobacco product sales, including electronic nicotine-delivery system product sales; retail tobacco product over-the-counter sales, which include electronic nicotine-delivery system product over-the-counter sales; mail-order sales initiated via mail, facsimile, telephone, or internet ordering or other types of electronic communications; and tobacco product, including electronic nicotine-delivery system product vending machine sales, as part of investigating compliance with the provisions of this chapter. Underage individuals, acting as agents for the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals and with the written permission of a parent or guardian for individuals under eighteen (18) years of age, may purchase, with impunity from prosecution, tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products, for the purposes of law enforcement or government research involving monitoring compliance with this chapter, provided that the underage individuals are supervised by an adult law enforcement official. Any individual participating in an unannounced compliance check of over-the-counter or vending machine sales must state his or her accurate age if asked by the sales representative of the retail establishment being checked.

In fulfilling the requirement of unannounced statewide compliance checks, the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall maintain complete records of the unannounced compliance checks, detailing, at least, the date of the compliance check; the name and address of the retail establishment checked or the mail order company; the results of the compliance check (sale/no sale); whether the sale was made as an over-the-counter sale, a mail-order purchase or a tobacco product, including an electronic nicotine-delivery system product vending machine sale; and if a citation was issued for any violation found. The records shall be subject to public disclosure. Further, the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall report to the owner of each retail establishment checked or mail-order company the results of any compliance check (sale/no sale) whether the sale was made as an over-the-counter sale, a mail-order purchase, or a tobacco and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system product vending machine sale, and if a citation was issued for any violation found.

Seek enforcement, concurrently with other state and local officials, of the penalties as detailed in this chapter.

Develop and disseminate community health education information and materials relating to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 204, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 205, § 1, effective July 7, 2021.

11-9-13.7.
Signs concerning sales to individuals under age twenty-one (21).

Signs provided by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, or an exact duplicate of it made privately, shall:

Contain in red bold lettering a minimum of three-eighths inch (3/8") high on a white background the following wording in both English and Spanish:

Contain the phone number at the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, where violations of §§

11-9-13.2

—

11-9-13.19

can be reported, in addition to any other information required by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

Be displayed prominently for public view, wherever tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products, are sold at each cash register, each tobacco product vending machine, including each electronic nicotine-delivery system product vending machine, or any other place from which tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products, are sold. The signs shall be electronically available in both English and Spanish online at the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals’ website.

THE SALE OF TOBACCO PRODUCTS, INCLUDING CIGARETTES AND ELECTRONIC NICOTINE-DELIVERY SYSTEM PRODUCTS TO INDIVIDUALS UNDER THE AGE OF 21 IS AGAINST RHODE ISLAND LAW (, Rhode Island Statutes) PHOTO ID FOR PROOF OF AGE IS REQUIRED FOR PURCHASE. §

11-9-13.8(1)

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 336, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 429, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 204, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 205, § 1, effective July 7, 2021.

11-9-13.8.
Prohibitions applicable to license holders and their employees and agents.

A person holding a license issued under chapter 20 of title 44 and/or §

23-1-56

, or an employee or agent of that person, is prohibited from selling, distributing, or delivering a tobacco product, including an electronic nicotine-delivery system product:

To any individual who is under twenty-one (21) years of age; or

In any form other than an original, factory-wrapped package as sealed and certified by the manufacturer; or

As a single-cigarette sale (§

44-20-31

) or as a sale of cigarettes by the individual piece known as “loosies.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 204, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 205, § 1, effective July 7, 2021.

11-9-13.8.1.
Signs concerning the health effects of tobacco.

Signs provided by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, or an exact duplicate of it made privately, shall:

Contain in red bold lettering a minimum of one-quarter of an inch (1/4") high on a white background the following wording, in both English and Spanish:

WARNING: SMOKING CIGARETTES CONTRIBUTES TO LUNG DISEASE, CANCER, HEART DISEASE, STROKE AND RESPIRATORY ILLNESS AND DURING PREGNANCY MAY RESULT IN LOW BIRTH WEIGHT AND PREMATURE BIRTH.

The signs shall also include information regarding resources available to Rhode Island residents who would like to quit smoking.

The signs shall be displayed prominently for public view wherever tobacco products are sold at each cash register, each tobacco vending machine, or any other place from which tobacco products are sold. The signs shall be electronically available in both English and Spanish online at the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals’ website.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall have the power and authority to develop and disseminate signs pursuant to the requirements of this section for other tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products. The messaging included in the signs shall be based on the most current scientific evidence.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 336, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 429, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 204, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 205, § 1, effective July 7, 2021.

11-9-13.9.
Multiple citations prohibited.

No person shall be liable under this chapter for more than one citation on any one day. However, a single citation may list one or more violations of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 321, § 1.

11-9-13.10.
Prohibition on the distribution of free tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products.

The distribution and/or redemption of free tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products or coupons or vouchers redeemable for free or discounted tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products, to any individual under twenty-one (21) years of age shall be prohibited. Further, the distribution and/or redemption of free tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products or coupons or vouchers redeemable for free or discounted tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products, shall be prohibited, regardless of the age of the individual to whom the products, coupons, or vouchers are distributed, within five hundred feet (500´) of any school. The attorney general, or any local or state of Rhode Island police department, or their officers or agents, shall bring an action for any violation of this section. Every separate, free or discounted tobacco product, including an electronic nicotine-delivery system product or coupon or voucher redeemable for a free or discounted tobacco product, including an electronic nicotine-delivery system or product, in violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense subject to a fine of five hundred dollars ($500). The penalty shall be assessed against the person or individual responsible for initiating the Rhode Island distribution of the free or discounted tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products or coupons or vouchers redeemable for free or discounted tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products, and/or against the person or individual responsible for the redemption of such coupons or vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 409, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 426, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 204, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 205, § 1, effective July 7, 2021.

11-9-13.11.
Prohibition on the sale or distribution of tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products, through the mail — Conveyance of tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products, through the mail to individuals under twenty-one (21) — Proof of age of purchaser required — General rule.

The distribution, or sale or conveyance of tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products, to individuals under the age of twenty-one (21) via the United States Postal Service, or by any other public or private postal or package delivery service, shall be prohibited.

Any person selling or distributing tobacco products in the form of little cigars as defined in §

44-20.2-1

, snuff, any and all products defined in §

44-20-1

, or electronic nicotine-delivery system products directly to a consumer via the United States Postal Service, or by any other public or private postal or package delivery service, including orders placed by mail, telephone, facsimile, or internet, shall: (1) before distributing or selling the tobacco product, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products, through any of these means, receive both a copy of a valid form of government identification showing date of birth to verify the purchaser is age twenty-one (21) years or over and an attestation from the purchaser certifying that the information on the government identification truly and correctly identifies the purchaser and the purchaser’s current address, and (2) deliver the tobacco product, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products, to the address of the purchaser given on the valid form of government identification and by a postal or package delivery service method that either limits delivery to that purchaser and requires the purchaser to sign personally to receive the delivery or requires a signature of an individual age twenty-one (21) or over at the purchaser’s address to deliver the package.

The attorney general shall bring an action for any violation of this chapter. Any distribution, or sale or conveyance of a tobacco product, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products, to an individual under twenty-one (21) years of age via the United States Postal Service, or by any other public or private postal or package delivery service, shall be subject to an action against the distributor, or seller or conveyor by the attorney general of the state of Rhode Island. A minimum fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be assessed against any distributor, or seller or conveyor convicted of distributing, or selling or conveying tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products, via the United States postal service, or by any other public or private postal or package delivery service, for each delivery, or sale or conveyance of a tobacco product, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products, to an individual under twenty-one (21) years of age.

For the purpose of this section, “distribution,” “distributing,” “selling” and “sale” do not include the acts of the United States Postal Service or other common carrier when engaged in the business of transporting and delivering packages for others or the acts of a person, whether compensated or not, who transports or delivers a package for another person without any reason to know of the package’s contents.

Any delivery sale of cigarettes shall be made pursuant to the provisions of chapter 20.1 of title 44. The provisions of this section shall apply to each tobacco product listed in subsection (b) herein, which include electronic nicotine-delivery system products, but shall not apply to any delivery sale of cigarettes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 392, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 204, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 205, § 1, effective July 7, 2021.

11-9-13.12.
Enforcement and penalties — Citation for violation.

Any local or state of Rhode Island police department or the attorney general, their officers or agents, shall issue a citation for any violation of the requirements or prohibitions of this chapter.

The license holder receiving the citation may elect to plead guilty to the violation(s) and pay the fine(s) through the mail within ten (10) days, or appear in court to answer to the citation.

All recipients of third and subsequent citations within any thirty-six (36) month period shall appear in court for a hearing on the citation.

The failure of a license holder to either pay the citation through the mail within ten (10) days, where permitted under this section, or to appear in court on the date specified shall be cause for the court to hold the license holder in contempt of court with the penalty assessed a suspension of license for six (6) months and a five hundred dollar ($500) fine.

The court shall impose court costs and any other court fee(s) on anyone convicted in court of a violation of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 321, § 1.

11-9-13.13.
Nature and size of penalties.

Any license holder who violates a requirement of §

11-9-13.6(2)

or §

11-9-13.7

, display of specific signage, shall be subject to a fine in court of not less than thirty-five dollars ($35.00), nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), per civil violation.

The license holder is responsible for all violations of this section that occur at the location for which the license is issued. Any license holder who or that violates the prohibition of §

11-9-13.8(1)

or §

11-9-13.20

shall be subject to civil fines as follows:

A fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for the first violation within any thirty-six-month (36) period;

A fine of five hundred dollars ($500) for the second violation within any thirty-six-month (36) period;

A fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) and a fourteen-day (14) suspension of the license to sell tobacco products or electronic nicotine-delivery systems for the third violation within any thirty-six-month (36) period;

A fine of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) and a ninety-day (90) suspension of the license to sell tobacco products or electronic nicotine-delivery systems for each violation in excess of three (3).

Any person who or that violates a prohibition of §

11-9-13.8(3)

, sale of single cigarettes; or §

11-9-13.8(2)

, regarding factory-wrapped packs as sealed and certified by the manufacturer; shall be subject to a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation.

The department of taxation and/or the department of health shall not issue a license to any individual, business, firm, fiduciary, partnership, trust, association, or corporation, the license of which has been revoked or suspended; to any corporation, an officer of which has had his or her license revoked or suspended; or to any individual who is, or has been, an officer of a corporation the license of which has been revoked or suspended so long as such revocations or suspensions are in effect.

The court may suspend the imposition of a license suspension of the license secured from the Rhode Island tax administrator or department of health for a violation of subsections (b)(3) and (b)(4) of this section if the court finds that the license holder has taken measures to prevent the sale of tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products, to an underage individual and the license holder can demonstrate to the court that those measures have been taken and that employees have received training. No person or individual shall sell tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products, at retail without first being trained in the legal sale of tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products. Training shall teach employees what constitutes a tobacco product, including an electronic nicotine-delivery system product; legal age of sale; acceptable identification; how to refuse a direct sale to an underage individual or secondary sale to an individual twenty-one (21) years or older; and all applicable laws on tobacco sales and distribution. Dealers shall maintain records indicating that the provisions of this section were reviewed with all employees who conduct, or will conduct, tobacco product sales, including electronic nicotine-delivery system product sales. Each employee who sells or will sell tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products, shall sign an acknowledgement form attesting that the provisions of this section were reviewed with him or her. Each form shall be maintained by the retailer for as long as the employee is so employed and for no less than one year after termination of employment. The measures to prevent the sale of tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products, to underage individuals shall be defined by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals in rules and regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 103, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 366, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 336, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 386, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 409, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 426, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 18; P.L. 2021, ch. 204, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 205, § 1, effective July 7, 2021.

11-9-13.14.
Notification to the Department of Taxation of fines imposed.

The court shall maintain records of any penalty, fine or suspension imposed under this chapter and notify within sixty (60) days the tax administrator of the penalty, fine or suspension imposed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 321, § 1.

11-9-13.15.
Penalty for operating without a dealer license.

Any individual or business who or that violates this chapter by selling or conveying a tobacco product without a retail tobacco products dealer license shall be cited for that violation and shall be required to appear in court for a hearing on the citation.

Any individual or business cited for a violation under this section of this chapter shall:

Either post a two-thousand-five-hundred-dollar ($2,500) bond with the court within ten (10) days of the citation; or

Sign and accept the citation indicating a promise to appear in court.

An individual or business who or that has accepted the citation may:

Pay a ten-thousand-dollar ($10,000) fine, either by mail or in person, within ten (10) days after receiving the citation; or

If that individual or business has posted a bond, forfeit the bond by not appearing at the scheduled hearing. If the individual or business cited pays the ten-thousand-dollar ($10,000) fine or forfeits the bond, that individual or business is deemed to have admitted the cited violation and to have waived the right to a hearing on the issue of commission on the violation.

The court after a hearing on a citation shall make a determination as to whether a violation has been committed. If it is established that the violation did occur, the court shall impose a ten-thousand-dollar ($10,000) fine, in addition to any court costs or other court fees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 151, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 168, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 1, § 4.

11-9-13.16.
Rules and regulations.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall promulgate the rules and regulations necessary to fulfill the intent of §§

11-9-13.2

—

11-9-13.2

0.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 5; P.L. 2001, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 409, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 426, § 2.

11-9-13.17.
Fines collected.

One-half (1/2) of all the fines collected pursuant to §§

11-9-13.2

—

11-9-13.2

0 shall be transferred to the municipalities in which the citation originated.

One-half (1/2) of all the fines collected pursuant to §§

11-9-13.2

—

11-9-13.2

0 shall be transferred to the general fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 409, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 426, § 2.

11-9-13.18.
Prohibition on the sale or distribution of certain excise tax stamps.

The division of taxation shall not sell or distribute cigarette excise tax stamps, or permit the use of a metering machine as described in §

44-20-20

for any cigarette product packaged with less than twenty (20) cigarettes per package. The sale or distribution of cigarettes in packages of less than twenty (20) is prohibited.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 321, § 1.

11-9-13.19.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of it to any individual or circumstances is held invalid in a court test, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 321, § 1.

11-9-13.20.
Packaging of electronic nicotine-delivery system liquid.

No liquid, whether or not such liquid contains nicotine, that is intended for human consumption and used in an electronic nicotine-delivery system, as defined in §

11-9-13.4

, shall be sold unless the liquid is contained in child-resistant packaging.

Any liquid nicotine container that is sold at retail in this state must satisfy the child-resistant effectiveness standards set forth in 16 C.F.R. § 1700.15(b), when tested in accordance with the method described in 16 C.F.R. § 1700.20. All licensees under §

23-1-56

shall ensure that any liquid sold by the licensee intended for human consumption and used in an electronic-nicotine delivery system, as defined in §

11-9-13.4

, is sold in a liquid nicotine container that meets the requirements described and referenced in this subsection.

For the purposes of this section, “liquid nicotine container” means a bottle or other container of a liquid or other substance where the liquid or substance is sold, marketed, or intended for use in a vapor product. A “liquid nicotine container” does not include a liquid or other substance in a cartridge that is sold, marketed, or intended for use in a vapor product, provided that such cartridge is prefilled and sealed by the manufacturer and not intended to be opened by the consumer.

Any licensee or any person required to be licensed under §

23-1-56

who or that fails to comply with this section shall be subject to the penalties provided in §

11-9-13.13

.

The licensee is responsible for all violations of this section that occur at the location for which the license is issued.

No licensee or person shall be found in violation of this section if the licensee or person relied in good faith on documentation provided by or attributed to the manufacturer of the packaging of the aforementioned liquid that such packaging meets the requirements of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 409, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 426, § 1.

11-9-14.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 281, § 29; G.L. 1909, ch. 347, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 399, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 610, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

11-9-14

; P.L. 2001, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 426, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 223, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 204, § 3, effective July 7, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 205, § 3, effective July 7, 2021.

11-9-14.1.
Compliance with federal statutes and regulations.

The provisions of §§

11-9-13

,

11-9-13.1

,

11-9-13

.4,

11-9-13.6

,

11-9-13.7

,

11-9-13.8

,

11-9-13.10

,

11-9-13.1

1, and

11-9-13.12

shall be interpreted so as not to be less restrictive than the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. § 387 et seq., including 21 U.S.C. § 387f(d), or than Section 1926 of the federal Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. § 300x-26, or than any regulation promulgated or updated by the United States Food and Drug Administration or the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services arising from the acts; so as to comply with the provisions of the acts and related regulations in regard to prohibiting the sale of tobacco products, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products to individuals under the age of twenty-one (21) years; and so that the state may maintain qualification for federal funding regarding tobacco, the use and cessation of tobacco, including electronic nicotine-delivery system products. Nothing herein shall prohibit the state from enacting a statute or promulgating a regulation that is more restrictive than any provision of 21 U.S.C. § 387 et seq., or any provision of 42 U.S.C. § 300x-26.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 204, § 2, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 205, § 2, effective July 7, 2021.